Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 4. Rates and Rate Schedules.

Sec. 42.05.361.
Tariffs, contracts, filing, and public inspection.

Under regulations the commission shall adopt, every public utility shall file with the commission, within the time and in the form the commission designates, its complete tariff showing all rates, including joint rates, tolls, rentals, and charges collected and all classifications, rules, regulations, and terms and conditions under which it furnishes its services and facilities to the general public, or to a regulated or municipally owned utility for resale to the public, together with a copy of every special contract with customers which in any way affects or relates to the serving utility’s rates, tolls, charges, rentals, classifications, services, or facilities. The public utility shall clearly print, or type, its complete tariff and keep an up-to-date copy of it on file at its principal business office and at a designated place in each community served. The tariffs shall be made available to, and subject to inspection by, the general public on demand.

The tariffs of a public utility which are also subject to the jurisdiction of a federal regulatory body shall correspond, so far as practicable, to the form of those prescribed by the federal regulatory body.

The commission may reject the filing of all or part of a tariff that does not comply with the form or filing regulations of the commission. A tariff or provision so rejected is void. If the commission rejects a filing, it shall issue a statement of the reasons for the rejection. Unless the utility and the commission agree to an extension of time, the commission may not reject a filing under this subsection after 45 days have elapsed from the date of filing.

The commission may require a telecommunications carrier to make tariff filings related to telecommunications services provided to inmates in the custody of the Department of Corrections. Notwithstanding (a) — (c) of this section, the commission may not require a telecommunications carrier to make other tariff filings.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 1986; am § 8 ch 24 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For cost-of-service study and rate design information for electric utilities, see 3 AAC 48, art. 3.

For cogeneration and small power production, see 3 AAC 50, art. 2.

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

For water and wastewater utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 8.

For criteria for the provision of pay-per-call telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 6.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective November 27, 2019, added (d).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Where public utility company entered into contract to sell natural gas to federal military installations pursuant to federal statute governing such contract negotiations, Alaska Public Utility Commission was precluded by supremacy clause of U.S. Constitution (Art.
VI, cl. 2) from asserting its jurisdiction over the sale. August 4, 1976, Op. Att’y Gen.

The Alaska Public Utility Commission can require that a public utility file copies of its military supply contracts with the Commission pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. August 4, 1976, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 42.05.365.
Interest on deposits.

A public utility may collect and retain a deposit for contracted recurring monthly service. A public utility that collects and retains a deposit of over $100 for recurring monthly service shall pay interest on that deposit at or before the time it is returned. Interest paid under this section shall be at the legal rate of interest at the time the deposit is made. However, if the deposit is placed in an interest bearing account, the utility shall pay the interest rate of the interest bearing account.

If delinquent payments result in interruption of service, a public utility is not required to pay interest under (a) of this section for 12 months after reestablishment of service.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For legal rate of interest, see AS

45.45.010

.

Sec. 42.05.370.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.371.
Adherence to tariffs.

The terms and conditions under which a public utility offers its services and facilities to the public shall be governed strictly by the provisions of its currently effective tariffs.
A legally filed and effective tariff rate, charge, toll, rental, rule, regulation, or condition of service may not be changed except in the manner provided in this chapter.
If more than one tariff rate or charge can reasonably be applied for billing purposes the one most advantageous to the customer shall be used.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For criteria for the provision of pay-per-call telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 6.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Sec. 42.05.380.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.381.
Rates to be just and reasonable.

All rates demanded or received by a public utility, or by any two or more public utilities jointly, for a service furnished or to be furnished shall be just and reasonable; however, a rate may not include an allowance for costs of political contributions, or public relations except for reasonable amounts spent for

energy conservation efforts;

public information designed to promote more efficient use of the utility’s facilities or services or to protect the physical plant of the utility;

informing shareholders and members of a cooperative of meetings of the utility and encouraging attendance; or

emergency situations to the extent and under the circumstances authorized by the commission for good cause shown.

In establishing the revenue requirements of a municipally owned and operated utility the municipality is entitled to include a reasonable rate of return.

A utility, whether subject to regulation by the commission or exempt from regulation, may not charge a fee for connection to, disconnection from, or transfer of services in an amount in excess of the actual cost to the utility of performing the service plus a profit at a reasonable percentage of that cost not to exceed the percentage established by the commission by regulation.

A utility shall provide for a reduced fee or surcharge for standby water for fire protection systems approved under AS

18.70.081

which use hydraulic sprinklers.

The commission shall adopt regulations for electric cooperatives and for local exchange telephone utilities setting a range for adjustment of rates by a simplified rate filing procedure. A cooperative or telephone utility may apply for permission to adjust its rates over a period of time under the simplified rate filing procedure regulations. The commission shall grant the application if the cooperative or telephone utility satisfies the requirements of the regulations. The commission may review implementation of the simplified rate filing procedure at reasonable intervals and may revoke permission to use the procedure or require modification of the rates to correct an error.

A local exchange telephone utility may adjust its rates in conformance with changes in jurisdictional cost allocation factors required by either the Federal Communications Commission or the Regulatory Commission of Alaska upon a showing to the Regulatory Commission of Alaska of

the order requiring the change in allocation factors;

the aggregate shift in revenue requirement, segregated by service classes or categories, caused by the change in allocation factors; and

the rate adjustment required to conform to the required shift in local revenue requirement.

The commission shall allow, as a necessary and reasonable expense, all payments made to the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS

46.14.240

—

46.14.250

. The commission shall allow the public utility to recover these fees through a periodic fuel surcharge rate adjustment.

An electric or telephone utility that has overhead utility distribution lines and that provides services in a municipality with a population of more than 200,000 must spend at least one percent of the utility’s annual gross revenue from retail customers in that municipality to place existing overhead utility distribution lines in that municipality underground. In determining the annual gross revenue under this subsection, only revenue derived from the utility’s distribution lines in the municipality shall be considered.

An electric or telephone utility that is implementing a program to place existing overhead utility distribution lines located in a municipality underground may amend its rates for services provided to customers in the municipality to enable the utility to recover the full actual cost of placing the lines underground. Notwithstanding AS

42.05.411

—

42.05.431

, an amendment to a utility’s rates under this subsection is not subject to commission review or approval. A utility amending its rates under this subsection shall notify the commission of the amendment. This subsection applies to an undergrounding program to the extent that the costs do not exceed two percent of the utility’s annual gross revenue. If an undergrounding program’s costs exceed two percent, the commission may regulate rate increases proposed for the recovery of the amount above two percent.

When an electric utility or a telephone utility is implementing a program to place existing overhead utility distribution lines located in a municipality underground, any other overhead line or cable in the same location shall be placed underground at the same time. Each entity whose lines or cables are placed underground shall pay the cost of placing its own lines or cables underground.

The cost to the utility of storing gas in a gas storage facility or storing liquefied natural gas in a liquefied natural gas storage facility that is allowed in determining a just and reasonable rate shall reflect the reduction in cost attributable to any exemption from a payment due under AS

38.05.096

or

38.05.180(u)

, as applicable, and the value of a tax credit that the owner of the gas storage facility received under AS

43.20.046

or

43.20.047

, as applicable. The commission may request the (1) commissioner of natural resources to report the value of the exemption from a payment due under AS

38.05.096

or

38.05.180(u)

, as applicable, that the gas storage facility received; and (2) commissioner of revenue to report information on the amount of tax credits claimed under AS

43.20.046

and

43.20.047

, as applicable, for the gas storage facility or liquefied natural gas storage facility. In this subsection, “gas storage facility” has the meaning given in AS

31.05.032

.

The rates and terms and conditions of service of an incumbent local exchange carrier for basic residential local telephone service must be uniform within the carrier’s study area, as determined by the Federal Communications Commission.

The rates and terms and conditions of service of a competitive local exchange carrier for basic residential local telephone service must be uniform throughout the carrier’s service area.

The retail rates of a long distance telephone company for message telephone service for residential customers must be geographically averaged. If rates vary by distance over which calls are placed, the rate for each mileage band must be equal to or greater than the rate for the next shorter mileage band.

In this section, “local exchange carrier” and “long distance telephone company” have the meanings given in AS

42.05.890

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 106 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 45 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 104 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 1990; am §§ 1, 2 ch 81 SLA 1991; am § 11 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 1999; am § 89 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 7 ch 16 SLA 2010; am § 3 ch 51 SLA 2012; am § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019; am § 9 ch 24 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1999, in subsection (f) “Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(a), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For the Electric and Telephone Cooperative Act see AS 10.25.

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For cost-of-service study and rate design information for electric utilities, see 3 AAC 48, art. 3.

For simplified rate filing procedures for electric cooperatives, see 3 AAC 48, art. 5.

For regulatory policy standards, see 3 AAC 50, art. 1.

For cogeneration and small power production, see 3 AAC 50, art. 2.

For telephone utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 3.

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

For adjustment clause, see 3 AAC 52, art. 6.

For simplified rate filing and jurisdictional cost allocation factor adjustment procedures for local exchange carriers, see 3 AAC 53, art. 1.

For local exchange competition, see 3 AAC 53, art. 4.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, repealed (k)(2).

The second 2019 amendment, effective November 27, 2019, added (

l

) — (o).

Sec. 42.05.385.
Charges for water and sewer line extensions.

A water or sewer line extension may not be constructed unless the legislative body of each municipality through which the extension passes has approved the extension. This subsection does not apply to an extension that will not create any charges or assessments against the adjacent property.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, when utility service is available to a property owner as a result of a water or sewer line extension, the utility offering the service through the extension shall notify the property owner, according to the procedure set forth for service of process in the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, of the charges and interest due the utility if the property owner elects to obtain the utility service through the extension. The property owner does not owe the charge for the extension until the property owner connects to the extension.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, and unless the property owner connects to the extension,

charges do not accrue against the property for construction of the extension;

interest does not accrue against the property for the construction of the extension; and

a lien or encumbrance may not be levied against the property for the construction of the extension.

If the costs of constructing a water or sewer line extension have been paid by charges collected under this chapter, a utility may not charge for connection to the extension an amount greater than the actual cost of the connection.

The provisions of this section do not apply to a water or sewer line extension constructed by a municipality under AS 29.46.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

42.05.381(e)

-(i).
Renumbered in 1986.

Sec. 42.05.390.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.391.
Discrimination in rates.

Except as provided in AS

42.05.306

, a public utility may not, as to rates, grant an unreasonable preference or advantage to any of its customers or subject a customer to an unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage. A public utility may not establish or maintain an unreasonable difference as to rates, either as between localities or between classes of service. A municipally owned utility may offer uniform or identical rates for a public utility service to customers located in different areas within its certificated service area who receive the same class of service. Any uniform or identical rate shall, upon complaint, be subject to review by the commission and may be set aside if shown to be unreasonable.

A rate charged by a municipality for a public utility service furnished beyond its corporate limits is not considered unjustly discriminatory solely because a different rate is charged for a similar service within its corporate limits.

A public utility may not directly or indirectly refund, rebate or remit in any manner, or by any device, any portion of the rates and charges or charge, demand, or receive a greater or lesser compensation for its services than is specified in its effective tariff. A public utility may not extend to any customer any form of contract, agreement, inducement, privilege, or facility, or apply any rule, regulation, or condition of service except such as are extended or applied to all customers under like circumstances. A public utility may not offer or pay any compensation or consideration or furnish any equipment to secure the installation or adoption of the use of utility service unless it conforms to a tariff approved by the commission, and the compensation, consideration, or equipment is offered to all persons in the same classification using or applying for the public utility service; in determining the reasonableness of such a tariff filed by a public utility the commission shall consider, among other things, evidence of consideration or compensation paid by a competitor, regulated or nonregulated, of the public utility to secure the installation or adoption of the use of the competitor’s service.

Nothing in this section prevents a public utility from charging reduced rates to customers transferred to it from a competing utility provided the reduction is an integral part of a contract, arrangement, or plan to eliminate the overlapping of service areas or to minimize duplication of facilities and competition between public utilities.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 136 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 118 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For cost-of-service study and rate design information for electric utilities, see 3 AAC 48, art. 3.

For deregulation ballot: election procedure, see 3 AAC 49, art. 1.

For cogeneration and small power production, see 3 AAC 50, art. 2.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Sec. 42.05.400.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.401.
Apportionment of joint rates.

If public utilities share in a joint rate the apportionment of receipts shall be just and reasonable. The method of apportionment shall be approved by the commission and the commission may, if it considers it to be in the public interest, establish the portion to which each public utility shall be entitled.

If the commission does not have professional staff to investigate, evaluate, and testify regarding any proceeding under (a) of this section it may employ qualified professional consultants for this purpose at the direct expense of the parties to the dispute and divide the cost among the parties in the proportion of their respective operating revenues before commencement of the proceeding. The cost allocation to each party shall be determined before employment of the consultants and after giving the parties reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

Sec. 42.05.410.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.411.
New or revised tariffs.

A public utility may not establish or place in effect any new or revised rates, charges, rules, regulations, conditions of service or practices except after 45 days’ notice to the commission and 30 days’ notice to the public. Notice shall be given to the commission by filing with the commission and keeping open for public inspection the revised tariff provisions which shall plainly indicate the changes to be made in the schedules then in force and the time when the changes will go into effect. The commission shall prescribe means by regulation whereby notice is given to the public before or no later than 15 days after the filing that is reasonably adequate to notify customers affected by the filing. The commission, for good cause shown, may allow changes to take effect on less than 45 days’ notice to the commission or 30 days’ notice to the public under conditions the commission prescribes.

New and revised tariffs shall be filed in the manner provided in AS

42.05.361(a)

.

Upon the filing of a new or revised tariff, the commission upon complaint or upon its own motion, without notice, may initiate an investigation of the reasonableness and lawfulness of the change.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For simplified rate filing procedures for electric cooperatives, see 3 AAC 48, art. 5.

For regulatory policy standards, see 3 AAC 50, art. 1.

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

For simplified rate filing and jurisdictional cost allocation factor adjustment procedures for local exchange carriers, see 3 AAC 53, art. 1.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

Sec. 42.05.420.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.421.
Suspension of tariff filing.

When a tariff filing is made containing a new or revised rate, classification, rule, regulation, practice, or condition of service the commission may, either upon written complaint or upon its own motion, after reasonable notice, conduct a hearing to determine the reasonableness and propriety of the filing. Pending the hearing the commission may, by order stating the reasons for its action, suspend the operation of the tariff filing. For a tariff filing that does not change the utility’s revenue requirement or rate design, the suspension may last for a period not longer than six months beyond the effective date established in the tariff filing unless the commission extends the period for good cause. For a tariff filing that changes the utility’s revenue requirement or rate design, the suspension may last, unless the commission extends the period for good cause, for a period not longer than

six months before an interim rate equal to the requested rate goes into effect and not longer than 12 months before a permanent rate goes into effect if the annual gross revenues of the utility making the filing are more than $3,000,000; and

150 days before an interim rate equal to the requested new rate goes into effect and not longer than one year before a permanent rate goes into effect if the annual gross revenues of the utility making the filing are $3,000,000 or less.

An order suspending a tariff filing may be vacated if, after investigation, the commission finds that it is in all respects proper. Otherwise the commission shall hold a hearing on the suspended filing and issue its order, before the end of the suspension period, granting, denying or modifying the suspended tariff in whole or in part.

In the case of a proposed increased rate, the commission may by order require the interested public utility or utilities to place in escrow in a financial institution approved by the commission and keep accurate account of all amounts received by reason of the increase, specifying by whom and in whose behalf the amounts are paid. Upon completion of the hearing and decision the commission may by order require the public utility to refund to the persons in whose behalf the amounts were paid, that portion of the increased rates which was found to be unreasonable or unlawful. Funds may not be released from escrow without the commission’s prior written consent and the escrow agent shall be so instructed by the utility, in writing, with a copy to the commission. The utility may, at its expense, substitute a bond in lieu of the escrow requirement.

One who initiates a change in existing tariffs shall bear the burden to prove the reasonableness of the change.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 136 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 87 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For simplified rate filing procedures for electric cooperatives, see 3 AAC 48, art. 5.

For simplified rate filing and jurisdictional cost allocation factor adjustment procedures for local exchange carriers, see 3 AAC 53, art. 1.

For local exchange competition, see 3 AAC 53, art. 4.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

Sec. 42.05.430.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.431.
Power of commission to fix rates.

When the commission, after an investigation and hearing, finds that a rate demanded, observed, charged, or collected by a public utility for a service subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, or that a classification, rule, regulation, practice, or contract affecting the rate, is unjust, unreasonable, unduly discriminatory or preferential, the commission shall determine a just and reasonable rate, classification, rule, regulation, practice, or contract to be observed or allowed and shall establish it by order. A municipality may covenant with bond purchasers regarding rates of a municipally owned utility, and the covenant is valid and enforceable and is considered to be a contract with the holders from time to time of the bonds. The financial covenants contained in mortgages and other debt instruments of cooperative utilities organized under AS 10.25 are also valid and enforceable, and rates set by the commission must be adequate to meet those covenants. However, a cooperative utility that is negotiating to enter a mortgage or other debt instrument that provides for a times-interest-earned ratio (TIER) greater than the ratio the commission most recently approved for that cooperative shall submit the mortgage or debt instrument to the commission before the instrument takes effect. The commission may disapprove the instrument within 60 days after its submission. If the commission has not acted within 60 days, the instrument is considered to be approved.

A wholesale power agreement between public utilities is subject to advance approval of the commission. After a wholesale power agreement is in effect, the commission may not invalidate any purchase or sale obligation under the agreement. However, if the commission finds that rates set in accordance with the agreement are not just and reasonable, the commission may order the parties to negotiate an amendment to the agreement and if the parties fail to agree, to use the dispute resolution procedures contained in the contract.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section,

a wholesale agreement for the sale of power from a project licensed by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission on or before January 1, 1987, and related contracts for the wheeling, storage, regeneration, or wholesale repurchase of power purchased under the agreement, entered into between the Alaska Energy Authority and one or more other public utilities or among the utilities after October 31, 1987, and before January 1, 1988, and amendments to the wholesale agreement or related contract, and the wholesale agreement or related contract assigned by the Alaska Energy Authority to a joint action agency formed under AS

42.45.310

that purchases the project from the Alaska Energy Authority, are not subject to review or approval by the commission until all long-term debt incurred for the project is retired, or, for a wholesale agreement or related contract assigned to a joint action agency formed under AS

42.45.310

, until all long-term debt incurred to pay the purchase price to the Alaska Energy Authority is retired; and

a wholesale agreement or related contract described in (1) of this subsection may contain a covenant for the public utility to establish, charge, and collect rates sufficient to meet its obligations under the contract; the rate covenant is valid and enforceable.

Meetings between the Alaska Energy Authority and public utilities concerning a wholesale agreement for the sale of power or other matter exempted from review of the commission under (c) of this section must comply with AS

44.62.310

.

Validated costs incurred by a utility in connection with the related contracts described in (c)(1) of this section must be allowed in the rates charged by the utility. In this subsection, “validated costs” are the actual costs that a utility uses, under the formula set out in related contracts described in (c) of this section, to establish rates, charges for services and rights, and the payment of charges for services and rights. This subsection does not grant the commission jurisdiction to alter or amend the formula set out in those related contracts.

In the establishment of rates of a utility furnishing solid waste material collection and disposal service, the commission shall permit recovery of reasonable, net capital and operating costs relating to solid waste recovery and recycling services after considering the utility’s recovery of revenue associated with the service.

In the establishment of rates under this chapter, the commission shall promote cost-effective solid waste recovery and recycling services.

When setting or reviewing rates for a public utility that sends or receives power over the power transmission interties between Fairbanks and Healy or between Anchorage and the Kenai Peninsula, the commission shall consider those costs that have not been directly assigned to other individual generating utilities by the utility responsible for the construction of the intertie to have been incurred for the system existing on August 11, 1993.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am §§ 4, 5 ch 104 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 11 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1991; am § 4 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 60 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as AS 42.05.511(d).
Renumbered in 1988.

Cross references. —

For provisions governing the Alaska Energy Authority, see AS 44.83.

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For simplified rate filing procedures for electric cooperatives, see 3 AAC 48, art. 5.

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

For simplified rate filing and jurisdictional cost allocation factor adjustment procedures for local exchange carriers, see 3 AAC 53, art. 1.

For local exchange competition, see 3 AAC 53, art. 4.

For universal service fund, see 3 AAC 53, art. 5.

For criteria for the provision of pay-per-call telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 6.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Alaska Public Utility Commission was not authorized to review the Long-Term Power Sales Agreement 4 Dam Pool — Initial Project of the Alaska Power Authority, a wholesale power agreement signed by the Alaska Power Authority [now Alaska Energy Authority], two electric cooperatives, and three cities in southeast Alaska, since the agreement was signed prior to June 7, 1986.
February 12, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

A power purchase contract between the Alaska Power Authority [now Alaska Energy Authority] and Municipal Light & Power is subject to approval by the Alaska Public Utilities Commission under subsection (b).
February 18, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen. (Opinion rendered prior to the 1988 amendment of this section.)

Sec. 42.05.433.
Review of certain contracts by the commission.

A precedent agreement or contract entered into by a public utility with the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation or its successors or assigns may contain a covenant for the public utility to establish, charge, and collect rates sufficient to meet its obligations under the contract. If the precedent agreement associated with the contract is approved by the commission under AS 42.08, the rate covenant in the associated contract is valid and enforceable.

A public utility negotiating to purchase natural gas to be shipped through an in-state natural gas pipeline regulated under AS 42.08 shall submit the contract to the commission before the contract takes effect.

A public utility negotiating to contract for the storage of natural gas shipped in an in-state natural gas pipeline regulated under AS 42.08 shall submit the contract to the commission before the contract takes effect.

The commission shall review and may conduct an investigation and hearing to determine whether a contract submitted under (b) or (c) of this section is just and reasonable. The review and determination shall be conducted as provided in AS

42.08.320(b)

— (d). The commission shall either approve the contract as presented or, if the commission finds that a contract is not just and reasonable, disapprove the contract. Notwithstanding AS

42.05.175

, if the commission has not acted within 180 days after the contract is submitted, the contract shall be considered approved and shall take effect immediately. The commission may, by order, extend the 180-day review period by the duration of a delay caused by a failure of the public utility to submit supplemental information that is available to the public utility. A contract that is approved or considered approved under this section is not subject to further review by the commission.

History.

(§ 18 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.05.440.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.441.
Valuation of property of a public utility.

The commission may, after providing reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard, ascertain and set the fair value of the whole or any part of the property of a public utility, insofar as it is material to the exercise of the jurisdiction of the commission. The commission may make revaluations from time to time and ascertain the fair value of all new construction, extensions, and additions to the property of a public utility. If a public utility furnishes more than one classification of utility service the utility shall allocate the investment and expenses associated with the property used and useful in furnishing service among the utility services and it may not solely consider the utility’s total investment and expenses in fixing rates for a particular service.

In determining the value for rate-making purposes of public utility property used and useful in rendering service to the public, the commission shall be guided by acquisition cost or, if lower, the original cost of the property to the person first devoting it to public service, less accrued depreciation, plus materials and supplies and a reasonable allowance for cash working capital when required.

For rate-making purposes, indebtedness, debt service, and payments by a regulated public utility to a person having an ownership interest of more than 70 percent in the utility shall be considered to be ownership equity, profits, or dividends except to the extent that there is a clear and convincing showing that

the indebtedness was incurred, or the payments made, for goods or services that were reasonably necessary for the operation of the utility; and

the goods or services were provided at a cost that was competitive with the price at which they could have been obtained from a person having no ownership interest.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 228 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Sec. 42.05.450.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]